Utah statutes.
62A-3-312.   Access to information in database.

The database and the adult protection case file:

(1)  shall be made available to law enforcement agencies, the attorney general's office, and county or district attorney's offices;

(2)  shall be released as required under Subsection 63G-2-202(4)(c); and

(3)  may be made available, at the discretion of the division, to:

(a)  subjects of a report as follows:

(i)  a vulnerable adult named in a report as a victim of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, or that adult's attorney or legal guardian; and

(ii)  a person identified in a report as having abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult, or that person's attorney; and

(b)  persons involved in an evaluation or assessment of the vulnerable adult as follows:

(i)  an employee or contractor of the department who is responsible for the evaluation or assessment of an adult protection case file;

(ii)  a multidisciplinary team approved by the division to assist Adult Protective Services in the evaluation, assessment, and disposition of a vulnerable adult case;

(iii)  an authorized person or agency providing services to, or responsible for, the care, treatment, assessment, or supervision of a vulnerable adult named in the report as a victim, when in the opinion of the division, that information will assist in the protection of, or provide other benefits to, the victim;

(iv)  a licensing authority for a facility, program, or person providing care to a victim named in a report; and

(v)  legally authorized protection and advocacy agencies when they represent a victim or have been requested by the division to assist on a case, including:

(A)  the Office of Public Guardian, created in Section 62A-14-103; and

(B) the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program, created in Section 62A-3-203.

